Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 10
CARE AND TREATMENT OF PERSONS
WITH MENTAL ILLNESS

27-10-101 to 27-10-129. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article repealed, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 675, § 1, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 71, C.R.S. 1963. This article replaced article 9 of this title, effective July 1, 1975. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2010, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume and the editor's note following the repeal of article 9 of this title. (For the version of article 1 of chapter 71 in effect July 1, 1975, see article 10 of title 27 in the original volume of C.R.S. 1973, pages 399 through 414.) The provisions of this article were relocated to article 65 of this title. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following each section in said article and the comparative tables located in the back of the index.